Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-302
Purposes of act.

(1) The purpose of the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act is to protect the health and welfare of the public, to protect the economic welfare and interest in pickle card sales and winnings, to insure that the profits derived from the operation of lottery by the sale of pickle cards are accurately reported in order that their revenue-raising potential be fully exposed, to insure that the profits are used for legitimate purposes, and to prevent the purposes for which the profits of lottery by the sale of pickle cards are to be used from being subverted by improper elements. Lottery by the sale of pickle cards shall be played and conducted only by those methods permitted in the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act. No other form, means of selection, or method of play shall be authorized or permitted.

(2) The purpose of the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act is also to completely and fairly regulate each level of the traditional marketing scheme of pickle cards to insure fairness, quality, and compliance with the Constitution of the State of Nebraska. To accomplish such purpose, the regulation and licensure of manufacturers of pickle cards, nonprofit organizations, distributors, sales agents, pickle card operators, and any other person involved in the marketing scheme are necessary.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 68;

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 5.